Florida, session 2026, HB1445.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1004.43521, Florida Statutes, is
created to read:
1004.43521 Parkinson's disease registry; public records
exemption.—
(1) Information held in the Parkinson's disease registry
under s. 1004.4352 which identifies a patient is confidential
and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Constitution.
(2) Such information may be disclosed to the following:
(a) The Parkinson's Disease Research Board.
(b) A private entity that the board has contracted with to
establish and maintain the registry if such entity agrees to:
1. Submit a research plan to the board which specifies the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1445 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1445 2026 Legislature
exact nature of the information requested and the intended use
of the information;
2. Maintain the confidentiality of the records or
information if personal identifying information is made
available to the entity;
3. Destroy any confidential records or information
obtained after the research is concluded; and
4. Not directly or indirectly contact, for any purpose,
any patient.
(3) This section is subject to the Open Government Sunset
Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed
on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that is a public
necessity that information held in the Parkinson's disease
registry under s. 1004.4352, Florida Statutes, which would
identify a patient be made confidential and exempt from s.
119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the
State Constitution. Such personal identifying health care
information, if publicly available, could be used to invade the
personal privacy of the individual identified in the registry.
The Legislature finds that the disclosure of such information
could hinder the effective and efficient administration of the
registry. Further, the Legislature finds that access to such
information could be used to solicit or harass an individual
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1445 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1445 2026 Legislature
identified in the registry. Therefore, the Legislature finds
that information held in the Parkinson's disease registry which
would identify a patient should be confidential and exempt from
public records requirements.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 1443 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1445 -01-er